Louisiana, session 2026, HB487.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:232(introductory paragraph) and 1741(K) are hereby amended
and reenacted and R.S. 32:232(3)(h) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§232. Traffic-control signals
Whenever traffic is controlled by traffic-control signals exhibiting different
colored lights, or colored lighted arrows, successively one at a time or in
combination, only the colors green, red, and yellow shall be used, except for special
pedestrian signals carrying a word legend, and said. The lights shall indicate and
apply to drivers of vehicles and pedestrians as follows:
* * *
(3) Steady RED indication:
* * *
(h) If the violation involves entering a shoulder or turn lane to overtake a
vehicle that is stopped or slowing to a stop at a red indication, but does not result in
an injury, the offender shall be fined two hundred fifty dollars.
* * *
§1741. Immobilization of motor vehicles by booting; private property; legislative
findings
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 487 ENROLLED
K.(1) Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to prohibit any parish or
municipality from enacting ordinances that impose more restrictive requirements or
regulations than those provided in this Chapter.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no person shall
immobilize or boot a motor vehicle for failure to pay a citation issued through an
automated traffic enforcement system for a red-light traffic violation unless the
vehicle owner has first been afforded an administrative hearing relative to the traffic
citation. The provisions of this Paragraph shall not apply to Orleans Parish.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.